District of Columbia statutes.
16-2361

Effect of termination decree.

(a)

An order terminating the parent and child relationship divests the parent and the child of all legal rights, powers, privileges, immunities, duties and obligations with respect to each other, except the right of the child to inherit from his or her parent. The right of inheritance of the child shall be terminated only by a final order of adoption.

(b)

When an order terminating the parent and child relationship has been issued, the parent whose right has been terminated shall not thereafter be entitled to notice of proceedings for the adoption of the child by another nor shall such parent have any right to object to the adoption or otherwise to participate in the proceedings.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title IV, § 410, 24 DCR 3341
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 10(jj), 45 DCR 745
1981 Ed., § 16-2361.
1973 Ed., § 16-2361.